Oklahoma, session 2025, SB477.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 2 O.S. 2021, Section 7-414, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 7-414. A. The provisions of the Oklahoma Milk and Milk


Products Act shall not be construed to:


1. Include incidental sales of raw milk directly to consumers


at the farm where the milk is produced; or


2. Preclude the advertising of the incidental sale of goat milk


or donkey milk; and


3. Prohibit any farmer or producer from making cheese using


milk or cream produced on the farm of such farmer or producer.





Req. No. 1566 Page 1


B. For purposes of this section, incidental sales of goat milk


or donkey milk are those sales where the average monthly number of


gallons sold does not exceed one hundred (100).


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.




60-1-1566 MR 1/19/2025 5:37:10 AM





































Req. No. 1566 Page 2